Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.145.120

Rural jobs program—Match transfer account.

(1) The rural jobs program match transfer account is created in the custody of the state treasurer as a nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively for the rural jobs program created in RCW 28B.145.100. The purpose of the rural jobs program match transfer account is to provide state matching funds for the rural jobs program.

(2) Revenues to the rural jobs program match transfer account shall consist of appropriations by the legislature into the rural jobs program match transfer account.

(3) No expenditures from the rural jobs program match transfer account may be made except upon receipt of proof, by the executive director of the council from the program administrator, of private contributions to the rural jobs program. Expenditures, in the form of matching funds, may not exceed the total amount of private contributions.

(4) Only the executive director of the council or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the rural jobs program match transfer account. Such authorization must be made as soon as practicable following receipt of proof as required under this section.

(5)(a) The council shall enter into an appropriate agreement with the program administrator to demonstrate exchange of consideration for the matching funds.

(b) Once moneys in the rural jobs program match transfer account are subject to an agreement under this subsection and are deposited in the student support pathways account, the state acts in a fiduciary rather than ownership capacity with regard to those assets. Assets in the student support pathways account are not considered state money, common cash, or revenue to the state.

[ 2023 c 176 s 5; 2018 c 254 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 176: See note following RCW 28B.145.010.

Findings—Intent—2018 c 254: See note following RCW 28B.145.100.